West Virginia, session 2026, HB4849.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 9d. school building authority. §18-9D-22. Remediation of hazards to school buildings from natural causes. When natural processes create hazards to school structures which could reasonably be remedied and future occurrences prevented, the Superintendent of the county school district or the Local School Improvement Committee of the school, shall be authorized to apply to the School Building Authority for emergency funding to facilitate remediation of the hazard.The SBA shall immediately assess the hazard and facilitate an RFP process to address the necessary remediation. If the projected cost of remediation as reflected in the RFP process is less than 50% of the value of the school as reflected in the Comprehensive Education Facilities Plan, the SBA shall prioritize funding the remediation effort to protect and preserve the existing school structure.